District of Columbia statutes.
5-1011

Oath of members.

Each member of the trial boards shall take an oath to be administered by the Chief Clerk of the Police Department for the faithful and impartial performance of the duties of the office.

History

Apr. 16, 1932, 47 Stat. 87, ch. 118, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-804.
1973 Ed., § 4-604.

Transfer of Functions

Reorganization Order No. 46 of the Board of Commissioners, dated June 26, 1953, established in the Metropolitan Police Department the Chief Clerk’s section. The Order set forth the functions of the Chief Clerk’s section and abolished the previously existing office. This Order was issued pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 46 was replaced by Organization Order No. 153, dated November 10, 1966. Organization Order No. 8, dated April 18, 1968, revoked Organization Order No. 153 to the extent the same was inconsistent with Organization Order No. 8. Commissioner’s Order No. 69-614, dated November 13, 1969, provided in part that the Metropolitan Police Department shall continue in existence, headed by a Chief of Police who shall be responsible for the functions of said Department as previously established and constituted by Organization Order No. 153, as amended.